Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.535

Behavioral health innovation and integration campus—Teaching facility.

For purposes of siting and other land use planning and approval process, work should be done within the existing major institution master plan including the existing community advisory committee addressing land use and building permit approval for the behavioral health teaching facility under RCW 28B.20.530 and section 3, chapter 323, Laws of 2019.

[ 2019 c 323 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 323: See note following RCW 28B.20.530.